North Carolina statutes. Chapter 63. Aeronautics.
Article 10. Operation of Unmanned Aircraft Systems.

§ 63-94.
Applicability of Article.

Applicability. — This Article does not apply to model aircraft, as defined in subsection (b) of this section.

Model aircraft. — An aircraft, as defined in

G.S. 63-1

, that is mechanically driven or launched into flight and that meets all of the following requirements:

Is flown solely for hobby or recreational purposes.

Is not used for payment, consideration, gratuity, or benefit, directly or indirectly charged, demanded, received, or collected, by any person for the use of the aircraft or any photographic or video image produced by the aircraft.

History.

2017-160, s. 5.

§ 63-95.
Training required for operation of unmanned aircraft systems.

As used in this Article, the term “Division” means the Division of Aviation of the Department of Transportation.

The Division shall develop a knowledge test for operating an unmanned aircraft system that complies with all applicable State and federal regulations and shall provide for administration of the test. The test shall ensure that the operator of an unmanned aircraft system is knowledgeable of the State statutes and regulations regarding the operation of unmanned aircraft systems. The Division may permit a person, including an agency of this State, an agency of a political subdivision of this State, an employer, or a private training facility, to administer the test developed pursuant to this subsection, provided the test is the same as that administered by the Division and complies with all applicable State and federal regulations.

No agent or agency of the State, or agent or agency of a political subdivision of the State, may operate an unmanned aircraft system within the State without completion of the test set forth in subsection (b) of this section.

History.

2014-100, s. 34.30(g); 2015-232, s. 2.3.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-232, s. 2.3, effective August 25, 2015, in subsection (b), deleted “and skills” following “knowledge” in the first sentence, and added the second sentence.

§ 63-96.
Permit required for commercial operation of unmanned aircraft systems.

No person shall operate an unmanned aircraft system, as defined in

G.S. 15A-300.1

, in this State for commercial purposes unless the person is in possession of a permit issued by the Division valid for the unmanned aircraft system being operated. Application for the permit shall be made in the manner provided by the Division. Unless suspended or revoked, the permit shall be effective for a period to be established by the Division not exceeding eight years.

No person shall be issued a permit under this section unless all of the following apply:

The person is at least the minimum age required by federal regulation for operation of an unmanned aircraft system.

The person possesses a valid government-issued photographic identification acceptable to the Federal Aviation Administration for issuing authorization to operate an unmanned aircraft system.

The person has passed the knowledge test for operating an unmanned aircraft system as prescribed in G.S. 63-95(b).

The person has satisfied all other applicable requirements of this Article or federal regulation.

A permit to operate an unmanned aircraft system for commercial purposes shall not be issued to a person while the person’s license or permit to operate an unmanned aircraft system is suspended, revoked, or cancelled in any state.

The Division shall develop and administer a program that complies with all applicable federal regulations to issue permits to operators of unmanned aircraft systems for commercial purposes, including a fee structure for permits. Criteria and requirements established under the subdivisions set forth in this subsection shall be no more restrictive than the rules or regulations adopted by the Federal Aviation Administration setting forth the criteria and requirements under which a person may operate an unmanned aircraft system for commercial purposes. The program must include the following components:

A system for classifying unmanned aircraft systems based on characteristics determined to be appropriate by the Division.

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-160, s. 4, effective July 21, 2017.

A permit application process, which shall include a requirement that the Division provide notice to an applicant of the Division’s decision on issuance of a permit no later than 10 days from the date the Division receives the applicant’s application.

Technical guidance for complying with program requirements.

Criteria under which the Division may suspend or revoke a permit.

Criteria under which the Division may waive permitting requirements for applicants currently holding a valid license or permit to operate unmanned aircraft systems issued by another state or territory of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the United States.

A designation of the geographic area within which a permittee shall be authorized to operate an unmanned aircraft system.

Requirements pertaining to the collection, use, and retention of data by permittees obtained through the operation of unmanned aircraft systems, to be established in consultation with the State Chief Information Officer.

Requirements for the marking of each unmanned aircraft system operated pursuant to a permit issued under this section sufficient to allow identification of the owner of the system and the person issued a permit to operate it.

A system for providing agencies that conduct other operations within regulated airspace with the identity and contact information of permittees and the geographic areas within which the permittee is authorized to operate an unmanned aircraft system.

A person who operates an unmanned aircraft system for commercial purposes other than as authorized under this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Subject to the limitations set forth in subsection (d) of this section, the Division may issue rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this section.

History.

2014-100, s. 34.30(g); 2015-232, s. 2.4; 2016-90, s. 14.5; 2017-160, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-232, s. 2.4, effective August 25, 2015, rewrote the section.

Session Laws 2016-90, s. 14.5, effective July 11, 2016, in subdivision (b)(1), substituted “16” for “17.”

Session Laws 2017-160, s. 4, effective July 21, 2017, substituted “the minimum age required by federal regulation for operation of an unmanned aircraft system.” for “16 years of age.” in subdivision (b)(1); rewrote subdivision (b)(2), which read: “The person possesses a valid drivers license issued by any state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia.”; rewrote subsection (d), which read: “The Division shall develop and administer a program that complies with all applicable federal regulations to issue permits to operators of unmanned aircraft systems for commercial purposes. The program must include the following components:”; deleted subdivision (d)(2), which read: “A fee structure for permits.”; deleted the former second sentence in subdivision (d)(7), which read: “The rules adopted by the Division for designating a geographic area pursuant to this subdivision shall be no more restrictive than the rules or regulations adopted by the Federal Aviation Administration for designating a geographic area for the commercial operation of unmanned aircraft systems.”; and added “Subject to the limitations set forth in subsection (d) of this section,” to the beginning of subsection (f) and made a related stylistic change.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Drone Zoning,” see 95 N.C.L. Rev. 133 (2016).